Wisconsin, session 2025, AB562.
do enact as follows:AB562,12Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.AB562,1,33(1) Mississippi River Trail.AB562,2,64(a) Notice. On the date on which the department of transportation determines 1that each municipality located on the route of the Great River Road, as established 2in s. 84.107, has approved a resolution expressing support for the Mississippi River 3Trail effort and identifying and confirming a route for the Mississippi River Trail 4through each municipality, the department shall notify the legislative reference 5bureau. The legislative reference bureau shall publish a notice in the Wisconsin 6administrative register that specifies that date.AB562,2,97(b) Signs. No later than 18 months after the date specified in par. (a), the 8department of transportation shall procure and erect signs marking the Mississippi 9River Trail.AB562,2,1510(c) Funding. The department of transportation may submit a request to the 11joint committee on finance to supplement an appropriation of the department of 12transportation for the procurement and erection of signs under par. (b). 13Notwithstanding s. 13.101 (3), the committee is not required to find that an 14emergency exists prior to supplementing an appropriation of the department of 15transportation for the procurement and erection of signs under par. (b). AB562,2,1616